Maine, session 132, LD461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for 4 Maine State Trooper positions and related All Other to
conduct rural patrols in Washington County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $302,788 $312,477
All Other $13,000 $13,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $315,788 $325,477
2137
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $163,040 $168,257
All Other $7,000 $7,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $170,040 $175,257
2294 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
3205 takes effect when approved.